North Dakota, session 69, SB2113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-04-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-04-06. Temporary detention for purposes of examination.
Whenever there is reason to doubt the defendant's fitness to proceed, the court may order
temporary detention of the defendant for the purpose of an examination. The temporary detention must
be in the least restrictive appropriate setting, including the state hospital, the life skills and transition
center, or other suitable facility for a reasonable period, not to exceed thirty days, for such examination.
In lieu of detention, the court may allow the defendant to remain in the defendant's present residential
setting or other suitable residential setting for the purpose of examination, subject to any reasonable
limitation the court may impose. A human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic may be
considered if the court is aware an inquiry was made before the court ordered the evaluation to ensure
appropriate resources exist at the human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic being
ordered to conduct the examination. While the defendant is detained, the defendant's legal counsel,
family, and others necessary to assist in the defendant's case must have reasonable opportunity to
examine and confer with the defendant.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-04 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. Life skills and transition center patients, North Dakota youth correctional center students,
school for the deaf students, North Dakota vision services - school for the blind students, state
hospital patients, clients of regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health
clinics under direct therapeutic care, and residents of facilities licensed by the department of
health and human services may fish without a resident fishing license. Patients of these
institutions must be identified. The department shall issue authority to each institution.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 25-03.1-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 2
25-03.1-03.1. Disclosure of health information.
A treating facility or mental health professional may disclose individually identifiable health
information to a court, regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic, state's
attorney, appointed counsel, retained counsel, or other mental health professional, including an expert
examiner, and the disclosure is a disclosure for treatment, including the provision, coordination, and
management of health care and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 25-03.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-03.1-04. Screening and admission to a public treatment facility.
Under rules adopted by the department, screening of an individual to a public treatment facility for
observation, diagnosis, care, or treatment for mental illness or a substance use disorder must be
performed, in person when reasonably practicable, by a regional human service centerstate-operated
behavioral health clinic. This screening must be performed in the region where the individual is
physically located. Upon the request of a court, a law enforcement official, a mental health professional,
the individual's legal guardian, a minor's parent or legal custodian, or the individual requesting services,
the regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic shall conduct a screening. If a
request for screening is made by a mental health professional and the individual who is the subject of
the screening does not authorize the disclosure of the individual's protected health information, upon
the request of the regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic, any mental
health professional who treated the individual within the previous six months shall disclose, subject to
the requirements of title 42, Code of Federal Regulations, part 2, to the human service centerstate-
operated behavioral health clinic any relevant protected health information regarding that treatment.
Upon receipt of the request, the regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic
shall arrange for a screening of the individual and, if appropriate, shall treat the applicant or refer the
applicant to the appropriate treatment facility. Upon admittance to a public treatment facility, the
superintendent or director shall immediately designate a tier 1 or tier 2 mental health professional to
examine the individual.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 25-03.1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. In assisting the petitioner in completing the petition, the state's attorney may direct a tier 1 or
tier 2 mental health professional designated by the regional human service centerstate-
operated behavioral health clinic to investigate and evaluate the specific facts alleged by the
petitioner. The investigation must be completed as promptly as possible and include
observations of and conversation with the respondent, unless the respondent cannot be found
or refuses to meet with the mental health professional. A written report of the results of the
investigation must be delivered to the state's attorney. Copies of the report must be made
available upon request to the respondent, the respondent's counsel, and any expert examiner
conducting an examination under section 25-03.1-11. The state's attorney or retained attorney
shall file the petition if the information provided by the petitioner or gathered by investigation
provides probable cause to believe the subject of the petition is a person requiring treatment.
A state's attorney who determines there are insufficient grounds for filing a petition may refer
the individual to other community resources. A state's attorney's decision not to institute
proceedings may be reviewed under section 11-16-06.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 25-03.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-03.1-10. Involuntary treatment - Court-ordered examination.
If the petition is not accompanied by a written supportive statement of a tier 1 mental health
professional or a licensed addiction counselor who has examined the respondent within the last
forty-five days, the court shall order the respondent be examined by an expert examiner of the

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 3
respondent's own choice or one appointed by the court. The order must state the date and time within
which the respondent must appear; the address to which the respondent is to report; a statement that if
the respondent fails to appear at the appointed place at or before the ordered date and time, the
respondent may be involuntarily taken into custody and transported to the appointed place; and a
statement the expert examiner may consult with or request participation in the examination by a mental
health professional and may include with the written examination report any findings or observations by
that mental health professional. Accompanying the order must be an explanation of the intended uses
and possible effects of this examination. The examination may be conducted at a treatment facility, at
the respondent's home, or at any other suitable place in the community. A request for examination at
the state hospital must be screened and approved by a regional human service centerstate-operated
behavioral health clinic. The respondent may be accompanied by one or more relatives or friends at the
place of the examination. The costs of the court-ordered examination must be borne by the county that
is the respondent's place of residence.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 25-03.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. If the expert examiner concludes the respondent is not a person requiring treatment, the court
may without taking any other additional action terminate the proceedings and dismiss the
petition. If the expert examiner concludes the respondent is a person requiring treatment, or
makes no conclusion whether the respondent is a person requiring treatment, the court shall
set a date for hearing and shall give notice of hearing to the persons designated in section
25-03.1-12. If the respondent is in custody and is alleged to be a person who is mentally ill or
a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder, the preliminary hearing
date must be within fourfive days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the
respondent was taken into custody through emergency commitment under section 25-03.1-25
unless a delay or continuance is concurred in by the respondent or unless extended by the
magistrate for good cause shown. If a preliminary hearing is not required, the treatment
hearing must be held within fourfive days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the
court received the expert examiner's report, not to exceed fourteen days from the time the
petition was served.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 25-03.1-19 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The involuntary treatment hearing, unless waived by the respondent or the respondent has
been released as a person not requiring treatment, must be held within fourteen days of the
preliminary hearing. If the preliminary hearing is not required, the involuntary treatment
hearing must be held within fourfive days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the
court received the expert examiner's report, not to exceed fourteen days from the time the
petition was served. The court may extend the time for hearing for good cause. The
respondent has the right to an examination by an independent expert examiner if so
requested. If the respondent is indigent, the county of residence of the respondent shall pay
for the cost of the examination and the respondent may choose an independent expert
examiner.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 25-03.1-26 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Upon receipt of the petition and notice of the emergency detention, the magistrate shall set a
date for a preliminary hearing, if the respondent is alleged to be a person who is mentally ill or
a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder, or a treatment hearing, if
the respondent is alleged to be a person who has a substance use disorder, to be held no
later than fourfive days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, after detention unless the person
has been released as a person not requiring treatment, has been voluntarily admitted for
treatment, has requested or agreed to a continuance, or unless the hearing has been

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 4
extended by the magistrate for good cause shown. The magistrate shall appoint counsel if one
has not been retained by the respondent.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 26.1-36-08 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
b. In the case of benefits provided for partial hospitalization, the benefits must be provided
for a minimum of one hundred twenty days of services covered under this section and
section 26.1-36-09 in any calendar year. Services provided under this subdivision must
be provided by an addiction treatment program licensed under chapter 50-31. For
services provided in regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health
clinics, charges must be reasonably similar to the charges for care provided by hospitals
as defined in this subsection.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subdivisions c and d of subsection 2 of section 26.1-36-09 of the
North Dakota Century Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
c. In the case of benefits provided for partial hospitalization, the benefits must be provided
for a minimum of one hundred twenty days of services covered under this section and
section 26.1-36-08 in any calendar year. Partial hospitalization must be provided by a
hospital as defined under section 52-01-01 and rules of the department of health and
human services pursuant thereto or by a regional human service centerstate-operated
behavioral health clinic licensed under section 50-06-05.2, offering treatment for the
prevention or cure of mental disorder or other related illness. For services provided in
regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, charges must be
reasonably similar to the charges for care provided by hospitals as defined in this
subsection.
d. In the case of benefits provided for residential treatment, the benefits must be provided
for a minimum of one hundred twenty days of services covered under this section in any
calendar year. Residential treatment services must be provided by a hospital as defined
under section 52-01-01 and rules of the department of health and human services; by a
regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic licensed under
section 50-06-05.2 offering treatment for the prevention or cure of mental disorder or
other related illness; or by a residential treatment program. For services provided in a
regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic, charges must be
reasonably similar to the charges for care provided by a hospital as defined in this
subsection.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Subsection 9 of section 43-12.1-04 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
9. A person that provides medications, other than by the parenteral route:
a. Within a correctional facility, in compliance with section 12-44.1-29;
b. Within a psychiatric residential treatment facility for children licensed under chapter
25-03.2 and North Dakota Administrative Code chapter 75-03-17;
c. Within a treatment or care center for individuals with developmental disabilities licensed
under chapter 25-16;
d. Within a group home, a qualified residential treatment program, or an adult foster care
facility licensed under section 50-11-01;
e. Within the life skills and transition center, to the extent the individual who provides
medications is a direct training technician or a vocational training technician as approved
by the department of health and human services;

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 5
f. Within a human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic licensed under
chapter 50-06; or
g. Within a primary or secondary school under a program established under section
15.1-19-23 if the individual has received education and training in medication
administration and has received written consent of the student's parent or guardian; or
h. Who is an employee of a qualified service provider agency who meets the criteria set
forth in subsection 2 of section 50-24.1-18.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 43-41-02 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. This chapter does not prevent individuals with master's or doctoral degrees in the field of
counseling with specialization in mental health from serving as counselors or therapists in
mental health in state institutions or regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral
health clinics, if they do not hold themselves out to the public as social workers.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 44-04-18.30 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
b. "Public social services agency" means a state, county, or local public agency that
provides human services, and includes regional human service centersstate-operated
behavioral health clinics, county social serviceshuman service zone boards, multicounty
social services districtshuman service zones, and the department of health and human
services.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-06-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Behavioral health" means the planning and implementation of preventive, consultative,
diagnostic, treatment, crisis intervention, rehabilitative, and suicide prevention services for
individuals with mental, emotional, or substance use disorders, and psychiatric conditions.
2. "Behavioral health provider" means any licensed or accredited behavioral health provider in
this state.
3. "Certified community behavioral health clinic" means a private or public behavioral health
clinic or a state-operated behavioral health clinic designated by the department to deliver a
comprehensive range of mental health and substance use disorder services in accordance
with the certification criteria set forth by the department.
4. "Department" means the department of health and human services.
4.5. "Human services" means:
a. A service or assistance provided to an individual or an individual's family in need of
services or assistance, including child welfare services, economic assistance programs,
medical services programs, and aging services programs, to assist the individual or the
individual's family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical
health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing.
b. A service or assistance provided, administered, or supervised by the department in
accordance with chapter 50-06.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 6
c. Licensing duties as administered or supervised by the department or delegated by the
department to a human service zone.
6. "State-operated behavioral health clinic" means a department-operated behavioral health
clinic established under section 50 - 06 - 05.2 .
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-01.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-01.4. Structure of the department.
1. The department includes the state hospital, the regional human service centersstate-operated
behavioral health clinics, a vocational rehabilitation unit, public health division, and other units
or offices and administrative and fiscal support services as the commissioner of the
department determines necessary. The department must be structured to promote efficient
and effective operations and, consistent with fulfilling its prescribed statutory duties, shall act
as the official agency of the state in the discharge of the following functions not otherwise by
law made the responsibility of another state agency:
a. Administration of programs for children and families, including adoption services and the
licensure of child-placing agencies, foster care services and the licensure of foster care
arrangements, certification of shelter care services, child protection services, children's
trust fund, licensure of early childhood programs, refugee services, in-home
community-based services, quality control, and administration of the interstate compacts
on the placement of children and juveniles.
b. Administration of programs for individuals with developmental disabilities, including
licensure of facilities and services, the establishment funding for family members and
corporate guardianships, and the design and implementation of a community-based
service system for persons in need of habilitation.
c. Administration of aging service programs, including nutrition, transportation, advocacy,
social, ombudsman, recreation, and related services funded under the Older Americans
Act of 1965 [42 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.], home and community-based services, licensure of
adult foster care homes, and the committee on aging.
d. Administration of behavioral health programs, including reviewing and identifying service
needs and activities in the state's behavioral health system in an effort to ensure health
and safety, access to services, and quality of services; establishing quality assurance
standards for the licensure of substance use disorder program services and facilities;
providing policy leadership in partnership with public and private entities; and providing
chronic disease management, regional intervention services, and twenty-four-hour crisis
services for individuals with behavioral health disorders.
e. Administration of economic assistance programs, including temporary assistance for
needy families, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, home energy assistance,
child care assistance, refugee assistance, work experience, work incentive, and quality
control.
f. Administration of medical service programs, including medical assistance for children's
health insurance program, Medicaid waivers, early and periodic screening, diagnosis and
treatment, utilization control, autism services, and claims processing.
g. Administration of general assistance.
h. Administration of child support.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 7
i. Administration of program, services, and licensing outlined in title 23 and other previous
duties of the state department of health and state health council.
2. The commissioner of the department or commissioner's designee shall consult with and
maintain a close working relationship with the department of corrections and rehabilitation and
the superintendents of the school for the deaf and the North Dakota vision services - school
for the blind to develop programs for individuals with developmental disabilities; and with the
superintendent of public instruction to maximize the use of resource persons in regional
human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics in the provision of special
education services. The commissioner of the department or commissioner's designee shall
also maintain a close liaison with human service zones.
3. By August 1, 2019, theThe department shall establish a template for the development of
human service zone plans, including process and content requirements, access point
expectations, client grievances procedures, human resources, and locally funded programs or
services and how those services will be addressed.
4. The department shall develop, with assistance from the North Dakota association of counties,
a process for consultation and technical assistance for human service zone working groups by
August 1, 2019.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-01.7 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-01.7. Behavioral health division - Administration - Fees.
1. The department shall administratively restructure the behavioral health division to require the
division to develop and revise, when necessary, the state mental health plan and provide the
behavioral health division the authority to implement and supervise a unified mental health
delivery system and to assure the mental health services provided by the human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, the state hospital, and contracted services are
in accordance with the state plan.
2. The behavioral health division may establish nonrefundable application fees not to exceed
three hundred dollars for administration and enforcement of licensing and certification
activities. The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. All fees
collected under this section must be paid to the behavioral health division and must be used to
defray the cost of administering and enforcing licensing and certification activities.
SECTION 18. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-05.1. Powers and duties of the department. (Effective through June 30, 2027)
The department has the following powers and duties to be administered by the department through
its state office or regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, human service
zones, or otherwise as directed by the department:
1. To act as the official agency of the state in any social welfare or human service activity
initiated by the federal government not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another
state agency.
2. To administer, allocate, and distribute any state and federal funds that may be made available
for the purpose of providing financial assistance, care, and services to eligible persons and
families who do not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable
subsistence compatible with decency and health.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 8
3. To provide preventive, rehabilitative, and other human services to help families and individuals
to retain or attain capability for independence or self-care.
4. To do needed research and study in the causes of social problems and to define appropriate
and effective techniques in providing preventive and rehabilitative services.
5. To provide for the study, and to promote the well-being, of a child in need of protection, a child
in need of services, and delinquent children.
6. To provide for the placing and supervision of children in need of substitute parental care,
subject to the control of any court having jurisdiction and control of any such child.
7. To recommend appropriate human services related legislation to the legislative assembly.
8. To direct and supervise human service zone activities and administer a statewide program for
state-funded human services, staffing, and administration costs related to the administration of
human services.
9. To secure, hold, and administer for the purpose for which it is established any property and
any funds donated to it either by will or deed, or otherwise, or through court order or otherwise
available to the department, and to administer those funds or property in accordance with the
instructions in the instrument creating them or in accordance with the instructions in the court
order or otherwise.
10. To formulate standards and make appropriate inspections and investigations in accordance
with such standards in connection with all licensing activities delegated by law to the
department, including early childhood programs, nonmedical adult care facilities and maternity
homes, and persons or organizations receiving and placing children, and to require those
facilities, persons, and organizations to submit reports and information as the department may
determine necessary.
11. To permit the making of any surveys of human service needs and activities if determined to be
necessary.
12. To issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and compel attendance of witnesses and production of
documents or papers whenever necessary in making the investigations provided for herein or
in the discharge of its other duties. A subpoena may not be issued to compel the production of
documents or papers relating to any private child-caring or child-placing agency or to compel
the attendance as a witness of any officer or employee of those facilities except upon the
order of a judge of the district court of the judicial district in which the facilities are located.
13. To provide insofar as staff resources permit appropriate human services, including social
histories, social or social-psychological evaluations, individual, group, family, and marital
counseling, and related consultation, when referred by self, parent, guardian, human service
zone, court, physician, or other individual or agency, and when application is made by self (if
an adult or emancipated youth), parent, guardian, or agency having custody; also, on the
same basis, to provide human services to children and adults in relation to their placement in
or return from the life skills and transition center, state hospital, or North Dakota youth
correctional center.
14. To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological
evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, and aftercare services when requested by the
judge of a juvenile court. A court order under section 27 - 20.3 - 09, 27 - 20.4 - 08, or 27 - 20.4 - 17 or
pursuant to rules adopted by the judicial branch regarding treatment, if available, at the state
hospital or life skills and transition center shall comply with the requirements set forth in
chapters 25 - 03.1, 25 - 03.3, and 25 - 04 .

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 9
15. To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological
evaluations, predisposition reports, and treatment, when requested by the judge in a criminal
case. A court order under section 12.1 - 32 - 02 or 12.1 - 32 - 07 or pursuant to rules adopted by
the judicial branch regarding treatment, if available, at the state hospital or life skills and
transition center shall comply with requirements set forth in chapters 25 - 03.1, 25 - 03.3, and
25 - 04 .
16. To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the supplemental nutrition
assistance program and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that
program. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if
the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal
financial participation in administrative costs provided under Public Law 93-347 is decreased
or limited, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the
coupon bonus payments under the Food Stamp Act. Any request considered by the budget
section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. The department may not deny assistance under
the supplemental nutrition assistance program to any individual who has been convicted of a
felony offense that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled
substance as defined in section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)].
17. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the making of direct cash
assistance payments, housing stabilization supports, and rental assistance and to promote
cooperation and working agreements with public agencies and including the housing finance
agency and department of commerce, and private human service agencies.
18. To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the home energy assistance
program; to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program; and to
take such actions, give such directions, and adopt such rules, subject to review in the courts of
this state, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out this subsection. For purposes of the
administration of the energy assistance program, funds are obligated at the earlier of the time
a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered
or to be delivered, or at the time payment is made to a vendor or contractor for services or
supplies delivered or to be delivered. The provisions of this subsection concerning obligation
of funds apply to payments and commitments made on or after July 1, 1991. The department
with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is
not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in
administrative costs is decreased or limited to less than fifty percent of total administrative
costs, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the cost
of energy assistance program benefits. Any request considered by the budget section must
comply with section 54-35-02.9.
19. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of the cost of
the special needs of any child under the age of twenty-one years, who is living in an adoptive
home and would probably go without adoption except for acceptance by the adopted family,
and whose adopted family does not have the economic ability and resources, as established
by the department, to take care of the special needs of the child, including legal fees,
maintenance costs, medical and dental expenses, travel costs, and other costs incidental to
the care of the child.
20. To exercise and carry out any other powers and duties granted the department under state
law.
21. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of supervised
independent living services, to develop standards regarding a supervised independent living
program, to approve supervised independent living services for the purpose of providing foster
care placement, and to apply for and administer federal and other funds that may be made
available to undertake any of the activities described in this subsection.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 10
22. With the approval of the governor, to lease or transfer use of any part of the life skills and
transition center facilities or properties, located in section thirteen, township one hundred
fifty-seven north, range fifty-three west, located in Walsh County, North Dakota, to the federal
government, or any public or private agency, organization, or business enterprise, or any
worthy undertaking, under the following provisions:
a. The department determines that the facility or property is not needed to serve any
present or reasonably foreseeable need of the life skills and transition center.
b. The transaction is exempt from the provisions of section 50-06-06.6.
c. The term of any lease may not exceed ninety-nine years.
d. All required legal documents, papers, and instruments in any transaction must be
reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general.
e. Any funds realized by any transaction must be deposited in the state's general fund.
23. To act as a decedent's successor for purposes of collecting amounts due to the department or
human service zone, unless otherwise directed or determined by the department. Any affidavit
submitted by the department under section 30.1-23-01 must conform to the requirements of
that section except that the affidavit may state that twenty days have elapsed since the death
of the decedent.
24. To provide those services necessary for the department and for human service zones to
comply with the provisions of any law, rule, order, or regulation of the United States or any
federal agency or authority requiring civil service or merit standards or classifications as a
condition for providing funds administered by the department.
25. For purposes of administration of programs, and subject to legislative appropriation, funds are
obligated at the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services
or supplies either delivered or to be delivered. This subsection applies to payments and
commitments made on or after January 1, 1997.
26. To determine eligibility for medical assistance and children's health insurance program
benefits when the department receives a joint application for these benefits.
27. To develop a system of services and supports to provide behavioral health services and
supports in the community for children at risk of or identified as having a behavioral health
condition and for the families of these children. This system must include early intervention,
treatment, and recovery services and supports and must interface with, but not include, child
protective services or juvenile court.
28. To provide resources on mental health awareness and suicide prevention to the behavioral
health resource coordinator at each public school and to the designated individual at a
nonpublic school. The resources must include information on identifying warning signs, risk
factors, and the availability of resources in the community, and also must include an evidence-
based, online virtual mental health and suicide prevention simulation-based training program
that incorporates hands-on practice, contextual learning, and personalized feedback through
interactive role-playing. The provisions of chapter 54-44.4 do not apply to the online virtual
mental health and suicide prevention simulation-based training program under this subsection.
29. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for kinship care services and
payments and services in response to the federal Family First Prevention Services Act as part
of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 [Pub. L. 115-123].

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 11
30. To contract with another human service zone or any other public or private person to
discharge any of the department's duties or exercise any of the department's powers to
administer human services.
31. To act on behalf of the department of public instruction to administer part B, section 619 of the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act [Pub. L. 108-446; 229 Stat. 2647; 20 U.S.C. 1411
et seq.].
32. In the event of a disruption of operations, to provide meals at a fair value or without a charge
to employees of the department at the North Dakota state hospital, life skills and transition
center, and regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics twenty-four
hour staffed residential units as required by the job assignments of the employees.
33. May pay a stipend, within the limit of legislative appropriation, to a recipient or a provider of a
recipient receiving assistance or services under any program administered by or under the
supervision and direction of the department to allow the recipient or provider to serve on a
council or board.
34. Notwithstanding any other requirements, to appeal an order of a judge of the district court or
juvenile court that orders the department to perform or provide a function, service, or duty.
35. To require providers that receive funding from the department to submit process and outcome
measures to the department for programs and services supported by state funding for the
department to evaluate the administration of the programs and services using the
appropriation.
Powers and duties of the department. (Effective after June 30, 2027) The department has the
following powers and duties to be administered by the department through its state office or regional
human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, human service zones, or otherwise as
directed by the department:
1. To act as the official agency of the state in any social welfare or human service activity
initiated by the federal government not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another
state agency.
2. To administer, allocate, and distribute any state and federal funds that may be made available
for the purpose of providing financial assistance, care, and services to eligible persons and
families who do not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable
subsistence compatible with decency and health.
3. To provide preventive, rehabilitative, and other human services to help families and individuals
to retain or attain capability for independence or self-care.
4. To do needed research and study in the causes of social problems and to define appropriate
and effective techniques in providing preventive and rehabilitative services.
5. To provide for the study, and to promote the well-being, of a child in need of protection, a child
in need of services, and delinquent children.
6. To provide for the placing and supervision of children in need of substitute parental care,
subject to the control of any court having jurisdiction and control of any such child.
7. To recommend appropriate human services related legislation to the legislative assembly.
8. To direct and supervise human service zone activities and administer a statewide program for
state-funded human services, staffing, and administration costs related to the administration of
human services.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 12
9. To secure, hold, and administer for the purpose for which it is established any property and
any funds donated to it either by will or deed, or otherwise, or through court order or otherwise
available to the department, and to administer those funds or property in accordance with the
instructions in the instrument creating them or in accordance with the instructions in the court
order or otherwise.
10. To formulate standards and make appropriate inspections and investigations in accordance
with such standards in connection with all licensing activities delegated by law to the
department, including early childhood programs, nonmedical adult care facilities and maternity
homes, and persons or organizations receiving and placing children, and to require those
facilities, persons, and organizations to submit reports and information as the department may
determine necessary.
11. To permit the making of any surveys of human service needs and activities if determined to be
necessary.
12. To issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and compel attendance of witnesses and production of
documents or papers whenever necessary in making the investigations provided for herein or
in the discharge of its other duties. A subpoena may not be issued to compel the production of
documents or papers relating to any private child-caring or child-placing agency or to compel
the attendance as a witness of any officer or employee of those facilities except upon the
order of a judge of the district court of the judicial district in which the facilities are located.
13. To provide insofar as staff resources permit appropriate human services, including social
histories, social or social-psychological evaluations, individual, group, family, and marital
counseling, and related consultation, when referred by self, parent, guardian, human service
zone, court, physician, or other individual or agency, and when application is made by self (if
an adult or emancipated youth), parent, guardian, or agency having custody; also, on the
same basis, to provide human services to children and adults in relation to their placement in
or return from the life skills and transition center, state hospital, or North Dakota youth
correctional center.
14. To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological
evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, and aftercare services when requested by the
judge of a juvenile court. A court order under section 12.1 - 32 - 02 or 12.1 - 32 - 07 or pursuant to
rules adopted by the judicial branch regarding treatment, if available, at the state hospital or
life skills and transition center shall comply with requirements set forth in chapters 25 - 03.1 ,
25 - 03.3, and 25 - 04 .
15. To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological
evaluations, predisposition reports, and treatment, when requested by the judge in a criminal
case. A court order under section 12.1 - 32 - 02 or 12.1 - 32 - 07 or pursuant to rules adopted by
the judicial branch regarding treatment, if available, at the state hospital or life skills and
transition center shall comply with requirements set forth in chapters 25 - 03.1, 25 - 03.3, and
25 - 04 .
16. To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the supplemental nutrition
assistance program and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that
program. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if
the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal
financial participation in administrative costs provided under Public Law 93-347 is decreased
or limited, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the
coupon bonus payments under the Food Stamp Act. Any request considered by the budget
section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. The department may not deny assistance under
the supplemental nutrition assistance program to any individual who has been convicted of a
felony offense that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled
substance as defined in section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)].

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 13
17. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the making of direct cash
assistance payments, housing stabilization supports, and rental assistance and to promote
cooperation and working agreements with public agencies and including the housing finance
agency and department of commerce, and private human services agencies.
18. To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the home energy assistance
program; to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program; and to
take such actions, give such directions, and adopt such rules, subject to review in the courts of
this state, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out this subsection. For purposes of the
administration of the energy assistance program, funds are obligated at the earlier of the time
a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered
or to be delivered, or at the time payment is made to a vendor or contractor for services or
supplies delivered or to be delivered. The provisions of this subsection concerning obligation
of funds apply to payments and commitments made on or after July 1, 1991. The department
with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is
not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in
administrative costs is decreased or limited to less than fifty percent of total administrative
costs, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the cost
of energy assistance program benefits. Any request considered by the budget section must
comply with section 54-35-02.9.
19. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of the cost of
the special needs of any child under the age of twenty-one years, who is living in an adoptive
home and would probably go without adoption except for acceptance by the adopted family,
and whose adopted family does not have the economic ability and resources, as established
by the department, to take care of the special needs of the child, including legal fees,
maintenance costs, medical and dental expenses, travel costs, and other costs incidental to
the care of the child.
20. To exercise and carry out any other powers and duties granted the department under state
law.
21. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of supervised
independent living services, to develop standards regarding a supervised independent living
program, to approve supervised independent living services for the purpose of providing foster
care placement, and to apply for and administer federal and other funds that may be made
available to undertake any of the activities described in this subsection.
22. With the approval of the governor, to lease or transfer use of any part of the life skills and
transition center facilities or properties, located in section thirteen, township one hundred
fifty-seven north, range fifty-three west, located in Walsh County, North Dakota, to the federal
government, or any public or private agency, organization, or business enterprise, or any
worthy undertaking, under the following provisions:
a. The department determines that the facility or property is not needed to serve any
present or reasonably foreseeable need of the life skills and transition center.
b. The transaction is exempt from the provisions of section 50-06-06.6.
c. The term of any lease may not exceed ninety-nine years.
d. All required legal documents, papers, and instruments in any transaction must be
reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general.
e. Any funds realized by any transaction must be deposited in the state's general fund.
23. To act as a decedent's successor for purposes of collecting amounts due to the department or
human service zone, unless otherwise directed or determined by the department. Any affidavit

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 14
submitted by the department under section 30.1-23-01 must conform to the requirements of
that section except that the affidavit may state that twenty days have elapsed since the death
of the decedent.
24. To provide those services necessary for the department and for human service zones to
comply with the provisions of any law, rule, order, or regulation of the United States or any
federal agency or authority requiring civil service or merit standards or classifications as a
condition for providing funds administered by the department.
25. For purposes of administration of programs, and subject to legislative appropriation, funds are
obligated at the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services
or supplies either delivered or to be delivered. This subsection applies to payments and
commitments made on or after January 1, 1997.
26. To determine eligibility for medical assistance and children's health insurance program
benefits when the department receives a joint application for these benefits.
27. To develop a system of services and supports to provide behavioral health services and
supports in the community for children at risk of or identified as having a behavioral health
condition and for the families of these children. This system must include early intervention,
treatment, and recovery services and supports and must interface with, but not include, child
protective services or juvenile court.
28. To provide resources on mental health awareness and suicide prevention to the behavioral
health resource coordinator at each school. The resources must include information on
identifying warning signs, risk factors, and the availability of resources in the community.
29. To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for kinship care services and
payments and services in response to the federal Family First Prevention Services Act as part
of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 [Pub. L. 115-123].
30. To contract with another human service zone or any other public or private person to
discharge any of the department's duties or exercise any of the department's powers to
administer human services.
31. To act on behalf of the department of public instruction to administer part B, section 619 of the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act [Pub. L. 108-446; 229 Stat. 2647; 20 U.S.C. 1411
et seq.].
32. In the event of a disruption of operations, to provide meals at a fair value or without a charge
to employees of the department at the North Dakota state hospital, life skills and transition
center, and regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics twenty-four
hour staffed residential units as required by the job assignments of the employees.
33. May pay a stipend, within the limit of legislative appropriation, to a recipient or a provider of a
recipient receiving assistance or services under any program administered by or under the
supervision and direction of the department to allow the recipient or provider to serve on a
council or board.
34. Notwithstanding any other requirements, to appeal an order of a judge of the district court or
juvenile court that orders the department to perform or provide a function, service, or duty.
35. To require providers that receive funding from the department to submit process and outcome
measures to the department for programs and services supported by state funding for the
department to evaluate the administration of the programs and services using the
appropriation for the program or service.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 15
SECTION 19. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-05.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-05.2. Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics -
Licensure.
Human
1. Community-based behavioral health services must be delivered through regional human
service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics in the areas designated by the
governor's executive order 1978-12 dated October 5, 1978. The department shall request
appropriations and resources sufficient for accreditation:
a. Accreditation and to ensure maintenance of the accreditation for the regional human
service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, including associated facilities, by
the council on accreditationthe social current or by a similar national accrediting body
accepted by the department; and
b. Certification as a certified community behavioral health clinic.
2. The regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics are subject to
licensing or certification by the department. The department may use the accreditation as a
basis for licensing in lieu of adopted rules for the operation of the regional human service
centers state - operated behavioral health clinics . The department shallmay adopt rules for the
operation of the regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics. A
regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic may not operate without
a license or certification issued in accordance with this section or section 32 of this Ac t.
Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics are authorized to
receive federal and other funds available to finance, in whole or in part, the services and
operations of the centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics.
SECTION 20. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-05.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-05.3. Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics - Powers
- Duties - Human service advisoryAdvisory groups.
1. Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics shall provide human
services and assistance to all eligible individuals and families to help individuals and families
achieve or maintainsupport individuals in achieving social, emotional, and economic
self-sufficiency by providing human services and assistance to:
a. Prevent, reduce, or eliminate dependencyBuild resilience, self-sufficiency, and
independence;
b. Prevent or reduce inappropriateSupport individuals to succeed in the least restrictive
environments, reduce the need for institutional care by providing for care while
institutionalized or providing foraccess to community-based orand other forms of less
restrictivesupportive services that span the continuum of care;
c. Secure referral or admission for institutional careFacilitate access to specialized care
when needed and coordinate timely referrals and transitions to appropriate levels of care;
d. Provide outpatient diagnostic and treatment services; and
e. Provide rehabilitationrehabilitative and crisis services for patients withsupport for
individuals with mental health, emotional, or substance use disorders, an intellectual
disability, and other psychiatric conditions, particularly for those patients who have

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 16
received prior treatment in anchallenges, including those with complex needs, to promote
continuity of care and successful reentry from inpatient facilitysettings.
2. Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics shall deliver services
in the manner prescribed by the department.
3. Regional human service centersState-operated behavioral health clinics may provide
behavioral health collaborative care and consultation services, including psychiatric
consultation, with private providers and correctional facility providers.
4. Each regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic must have a
human servicesbehavioral health clinic advisory group consisting of the human service zone
directors of the region served, the public health directors of the region served, two current
county commissioners appointed by the commissioner of the department or the
commissioner's designee, and five additional members appointed by the commissioner of the
department or the commissioner's designee. Each behavioral health clinic advisory group
member must be a resident of the region the member is appointed to serve. The term of office
for each appointed member is two years and arranged so that the term of three of the
appointed members expires at the end of the first year and the term of the remaining four
appointed members expires at the end of the second year, except for those first members
appointed, three members shall serve a one-year term and four members shall serve a
two-year term. The commissioner of the department or the commissioner's designee shall
select the appointed members of each human servicebehavioral health clinic advisory group
on the basis of population of the counties in the region served by the regional human service
centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic. Each county in the region must be represented
by at least one member on the human servicebehavioral health clinic advisory group. To the
extent possible, appointed membership of the behavioral health clinic advisory group must
reflect regional interests in the fields of developmental disabilities, social services, mental
health, and substance use disorders. The commissioner of the department or the
commissioner's designee shall appoint a chairman for each behavioral health clinic advisory
group from the membership of the behavioral health clinic advisory group. The commissioner
of the department or the commissioner's designee shall fill a vacancy occurring within ana
behavioral health clinic advisory group for other than the expiration of a term in the same
manner as original appointments, except that appointments must be made only for the
unexpired term. The department shall compensate appointed members of a human
servicebehavioral health clinic advisory group at the rate of forty-five dollars per day, not to
exceed twenty-five days in any one year. The department also shall pay members for mileage
and actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and in the performance of their official
duties in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-05.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-05.4. Duties of human servicebehavioral health clinic advisory groups.
Each human servicebehavioral health clinic advisory group of the regional human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics shall perform the following duties:
1. Provide information to the department relative to needs assessment and the planning and
development of health and social resources for the effective and efficient delivery of
high-quality humanbehavioral health services fully accessible to all citizens.
2. Review services and programs provided by the regional human service centersstate-operated
behavioral health clinics and make periodic recommendations for improvement in services,
programs, or facilities.
3. Promote cooperation and working agreements with public agencies, including public health
and corrections and private human servicebehavioral health agencies.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 17
4. Promote local and regional financing from public and private sources.
SECTION 22. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-05.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-05.5. Director of regional centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic - Medical
director.
Each regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic must be headed by a
regional director appointed by the commissioner of the department. The regionalstate-operated
behavioral health clinic director must be accountable to the commissioner of the department or the
commissioner's designee. Each regionalstate-operated behavioral health clinic director may employ the
staff necessary to discharge the center'sstate-operated behavioral health clinic's responsibilities. A
regionalstate-operated behavioral health clinic director, subject to the approval of the commissioner of
the department or the commissioner's designee, and within the limit of legislative appropriations, may
make contractual arrangements with public or private agencies or with individuals and organizations to
discharge the regional human service center'sstate-operated behavioral health clinic's service delivery
responsibilities. Each regional director shall hire a qualified medical professional who must be
designated as the medical director of the centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic. The medical
director is responsible for coordinating mental health and medically related services. The medical
director's position may be part time or full time as determined appropriate by the regionalstate-operated
behavioral health clinic director, with the concurrence of the commissioner of the department or the
commissioner's designee. As used in this section, "qualified medical professional" means a board-
eligible or board-certified psychiatrist, when such an individual can be employed, and when this is not
possible, an individual possessing at least a medical degree.
SECTION 23. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-06.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-06.2. Clinic services - Provider qualification - Utilization of federal funds.
Within the limits of legislative appropriation therefor and in accordance with rules established by the
department, the department may defray the costs of preventive diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or
palliative items or services furnished medical assistance eligible individuals by regional human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics or designated behavioral health providers. Within the
limits of legislative appropriations and to the extent permitted by state and federal law and regulations
established thereunder, it is the intent of the legislative assembly that federal funds available under title
XIX of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.] be utilized to defray the costs of identifiable
mental health clinic services furnished eligible individuals in regional human service centersstate-
operated behavioral health clinics and that federal funds available under title XX of the Social Security
Act [42 U.S.C. 1397 et seq.] be utilized to defray the costs of identifiable human services furnished to
eligible individuals by human service zones and regional human service centersstate-operated
behavioral health clinics.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-06.5 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-06.5. Continuum of services for individuals with serious and persistent mental illness.
1. The department shall develop a plan for an integrated, multidisciplinary continuum of services
for individuals with serious and persistent mental illness. The continuum may consist of an
array of services provided by private mental health professionals, private agencies, human
service zones, regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics,
community-based residential care and treatment facilities, and private and public inpatient
psychiatric hospitals. When appropriate, access to the continuum must be through regional
human service centers. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the plan for a continuum
may include:

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 18
a. Programs, and appropriate related facilities, to provide socialization skills.
b. Programs, and appropriate related facilities, to provide basic living skills.
c. Appropriate residential facilities and other housing options.
d. Appropriate training, placement, and support to enhance potential for employment.
e. Appropriate delivery and control of necessary medication.
f. Appropriate economic assistance.
g. An inpatient facility with appropriate programs to respond to persons who require
hospitalization.
h. Peer and recovery support.
i. Crisis service that is available twenty-four hours a day seven days a week.
2. The continuum of care must provide that a person requiring treatment be submitted to the
least restrictive available conditions necessary to achieve the purposes of treatment. The
department shall ensure appropriate cooperation with human service zones and private
providers in achieving the continuum of care.
SECTION 25. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-06.13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-06.13. Treatment services for children with serious emotional disorders.
1. The department shall establish a program to provide out-of-home treatment services for a
Medicaid-eligible child with a serious emotional disorder. The department may not require a
parent or legal guardian to transfer legal custody of the child in order to have the child placed
in an out-of-home treatment program if the sole reason for the placement is the need to obtain
services for the child's emotional or behavioral problems. With departmental approval, a
parent with legal and physical custody or a legal guardian of the child may obtain treatment
services for the child through the program. A parent without physical custody of a child, who
disagrees with a child's treatment under this section, may request a judicial determination
regarding the child's treatment.
2. The department may establish a program to prevent out-of-home placement for a Medicaid-
eligible child with a behavior health condition as defined in the "Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders", American psychiatric association, fifth edition, text revision
(2013).
SECTION 26. AMENDMENT. Subsections 1 and 3 of section 50-06-15 of the North Dakota Century
Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Individually identifiable information concerning an individual applying for or receiving
assistance or services under any program administered by or under the supervision and
direction of the department is confidential, except that any such information, including an
individual's social security number, may be used and disclosed:
a. In the administration of any such program;
b. In accordance with a program's participation in the department's master client index data
matching system, unless prohibited by federal law;
c. As specifically authorized by the rules of the department; or
d. As permitted or required by other law; or

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 19
e. Notwithstanding confidentiality laws set forth in titles 14, 23, 25, 43, and 50 and the
department's rules, within and between the department's divisions to assist with or to
provide assistance or services under any program administered by or under the
supervision and direction of the department. The disclosure of information under this
subdivision must comply with applicable federal laws and regulations.
3. As used in this section, "individually identifiable information" means information, including an
individual's name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, social security number,
electronic mail address, program identification number, protected health information,
personally identifiable information, or any other unique identifying number, characteristic, or
code, as well as demographic information collected from an individual, that:
a. Is created or received by the department; and
b. Relates to:
(1) The past, present, or future assistance or services applied for or received by an
individual under any program administered by or under the supervision and
direction of the department that identifies the individual or with respect to which
there is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify the
individual; or
(2) A report, or any other information obtained, concerning an applicant or a provider of
or an individual applying for or receiving assistance or services under any program
administered by or under the supervision and direction of the department.
SECTION 27. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-06-33. Dementia care services.
As used in this section, "dementia" means the condition of an individual involving loss of memory
and impairment of cognitive functions severe enough to interfere with the individual's daily life. The
department shall contract with a private provider for a dementia care services program in each area of
the state served by a regional human service centerstate-operated behavioral health clinic. The
dementia care services must include:
1. Identifying available services within the region;
2. Providing information to medical professionals, law enforcement, and the public regarding the
symptoms of dementia, the benefits of early detection and treatment, and the services
available to individuals with dementia and their caregivers;
3. Assessing the needs of individuals with dementia and their caregivers;
4. Training care providers to manage and provide for the care of individuals with dementia;
5. Providing consultation services to individuals with dementia and their caregivers; and
6. Facilitating the referral of individuals with dementia and their caregivers to appropriate care
and support services.
SECTION 28. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-41.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06-41.3. Behavioral health bed management system.
1. The department shall establish and maintain a behavioral health bed management system to
improve utilization of behavioral health bed capacity.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 20
2. Public and private providers of residential or inpatient behavioral health services, except the
department of corrections and rehabilitation and geropsychiatric facilities, shall participate in
and report daily.
3. Geropsychiatric facilities shall participate in and report weekly and within forty - eight hours of a
bed becoming available.
4. Public and private providers of residential or inpatient behavioral health services required to
participate in and report to the department shall provide the information and documentation
necessary to maintain the behavioral health bed management system in the form and manner
prescribed by the department, unless otherwise specified.
SECTION 29. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 50-06-42 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The department shall establish and administer, within the limits of legislative appropriations, a
voucher system to address underserved areas and gaps in the state's substance abuse
treatment system and to assist in the payment of addiction treatment services provided by
licensed substance abuse treatment programs, excluding regional human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics and hospital- or medical clinic-based programs
for medical management of withdrawal. An out-of-state licensed substance abuse treatment
program located within a bordering state may participate in the voucher program to serve an
underserved area of this state pursuant to the rules adopted by the department. The
department shall develop rules to include processes and requirements for an out-of-state
provider to receive reimbursement only for outpatient and community-based services upon a
provider completing an assessment of need and receiving approval from the department.
SECTION 30. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 50-06-42.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A licensed substance abuse treatment program, excluding regional human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics and hospital or medical clinic-based programs
for medical management of withdrawal, may apply for a competitive substance use disorder
treatment voucher system grant. A licensed substance abuse treatment program is eligible for
a one-time grant award. To receive a grant, a licensed substance abuse treatment program
shall:
a. Submit an application in the form and manner prescribed by the department;
b. Enter a grant agreement with the department;
c. Use grant funds for a licensed substance abuse treatment program with fewer than
seventeen beds in an underserved area, as determined by the department, in the state's
substance abuse treatment system;
d. Use the grant funds to support the provision of substance use disorder treatment in
underserved areas of the state's substance abuse treatment system;
e. Provide and disclose information needed to comply with the department's data collection
requirements; and
f. Operate in compliance with grant requirements.
SECTION 31. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06-46 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 21
50-06-46. Cross-disability advisory council - Appointment - Duties. (Expired effective August
1, 20252027)
1. The cross-disability advisory council shall participate with and provide feedback to the
department regarding the implementation, planning, and design of the cross-disability
children's waiver, level of care reform for the comprehensive developmental disabilities
Medicaid home and community-based waiver, and a service option that will allow payment to a
legally responsible individual who provides extraordinary care to an eligible individual through
the Medicaid 1915(c) waivers. This subsection does not apply to the Medicaid 1915(c) home
and community-based services aged and disabled waivers.
2. The department shall contract with a qualified, independent third party to facilitate and provide
support services to the council. The contracted facilitator and the department shall appoint the
cross-disability advisory council members in accordance with subsection 3 and establish the
length of member terms and the structure of the cross-disability advisory council. A
representative from the contracted facilitator shall serve as the presiding officer of the advisory
council.
3. The cross-disability advisory council consists of up to fifteen voting members. A majority of the
members of the council must be family members of individuals with a disability, or must be
who represent a broad range of disabilities and regions of the state. The members are:
a. Two individuals with a disability, who receive Medicaid home and community-based
services. The remaining members of the council must be appointed based on their
professional subject matter expertise in or knowledge of the needs and interests of
individuals with disabilities. The council's membership must represent different regions of
the state and a broad range of disabilities that pertain to the Medicaid home and
community-based services.;
b. One individual with a developmental disability or who is Medicaid qualified, who does not
receive Medicaid home or community - based services ;
c. Seven individuals that work with individuals with disabilities, individuals with behavioral
health needs, or individuals with fetal alcohol spectrum disorder;
d. One individual representing tribal communities, with a focus on disability services;
e. Two individuals who are parents or guardians of children under the age of eighteen with
disabilities; and
f. Two individuals who are parents or guardians of individuals age eighteen or over with
disabilities.
4. Upon request of the department, state agency representatives shall participate with the
cross-disability advisory council in a nonvoting role.
4.5. The cross-disability advisory council shall meet at least quarterly and may appoint
subcommittees to address specific topics or disabilities, which may include autism spectrum
disorder, traumatic brain injury, and fetal alcohol spectrum disorder. A majority of the voting
members of the council constitutes a quorum.
5.6. The cross-disability advisory council shall:
a. Discuss strategies to address gaps or needs regarding individuals with disabilities and
Medicaid home and community-based services, including eligibility of legally responsible
individuals;
b. Provide for the active participation of stakeholders, including consumers and providers;
and

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 22
c. Receive information from the department and its consultants.
6.7. The cross-disability advisory council members, excluding the contracted facilitator, are entitled
to reimbursement from the department for travel and lodging at the same rate as provided for
state officers and employees.
SECTION 32. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Certified community behavioral health clinics - Rules.
1. To operate in this state, a certified community behavioral health clinic must be certified by the
department.
2. The department shall adopt rules for the certification of community behavioral health clinics,
including assessment of need in the proposed location.
3. The department may deny a request to become or revoke a certified community behavioral
health clinic's certification based on failure to comply with the rules adopted by the department
or deny a request to become a certified community behavioral health clinic based on the
assessment of need determination.
SECTION 33. A new section to chapter 50-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Financing of health and human services.
1. The powers and duties carried out by the department under this title may be financed out of a
special fund within the state treasury to be known as the health and human services operating
special fund;
2. The commissioner of the department or the commissioner's designee and the state treasurer
shall deposit in the health and human services operating special fund, at such times as they
may become available;
a. All moneys received from any of the counties within the state;
b. All moneys received from the United States under the provisions of the Social Security
Act;
c. Such moneys as may be periodically required from legislative appropriations for
department purposes; and
d. All public moneys received from any other source.
3. Expenditures made under this title must be paid upon vouchers prepared by the office of
management and budget drawn on the state treasurer against the health and human services
operating special fund and signed by the state auditor and state treasurer after approval by
the office of management and budget. Expenditures to be supported by itemized vouchers
must be signed by the commissioner of the department or by the commissioner's designee
and certified to the office of management and budget.
4. Any funds received from federal agencies must be deposited and disbursed as provided and
in accordance with Acts of Congress or the regulations of the federal agencies from which the
funds were received.
SECTION 34. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06.2-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 23
50-06.2-01. Purpose - Interpretation.
It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a system for planning, coordinating, and providing
comprehensive human services administered by human service zones and human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics. This chapter must be construed to effectuate the
following public purposes:
1. To help individuals or their families to achieve, maintain, or support the highest attainable level
of personal independence and economic self-sufficiency.
2. To prevent, remedy, or alleviate neglect, abuse, or exploitation of children and adults unable to
protect their own interests.
3. To provide a continuum of community-based services adequate to appropriately sustain
individuals in their homes and in their communities and to delay or prevent institutional care.
4. To preserve, rehabilitate, and reunite families.
5. To assist in securing referral or admission of individuals to institutional care when other forms
of care are not appropriate.
SECTION 35. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06.2-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06.2-02. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Comprehensive human services" means services included in the comprehensive human
services plan published by the state agency and human services required by state law or state
agency regulation or federal law or regulation as a condition for the receipt of federal financial
participation in programs administered under the provisions of this title.
2. "Family home care" means the provision of room, board, supervisory care, and personal
services to an eligible elderly or disabled person by the spouse or by one of the following
relatives, or the current or former spouse of one of the following relatives, of the elderly or
disabled person: parent, grandparent, adult child, adult sibling, adult grandchild, adult niece, or
adult nephew. The family home care provider need not be present in the home on a
twenty-four-hour basis if the welfare and safety of the client is maintained.
3. "Human service center" means a regional center established under section 50-06-05.3.
4. "Human service zone" means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human
services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the
state agency.
5.4. "Human service zone plan" means the human service zone plan required by section
50-06.2-04.
6.5. "Human services" means:
a. A service or assistance provided to an individual or an individual's family in need of
services or assistance, including child welfare services, economic assistance programs,
medical service programs, and aging service programs, to assist the individual or the
individual's family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical
health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing.
b. A service or assistance provided, administered, or supervised by the department in
accordance with chapter 50-06.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 24
c. Licensing duties as administered or supervised by the department or delegated by the
department to a human service zone.
7.6. "Qualified service provider" means a human service zone or independent contractor which
agrees to meet standards for service and operations established by the state agency.
8.7. "State agency" means the department of health and human services.
8. "State-operated behavioral health clinic" means a department-operated behavioral health
clinic established under section 50 - 06 - 05.2 .
SECTION 36. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06.2-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06.2-03. Powers and duties of the state agency.
1. The state agency has the following powers or duties under this chapter:
1. a. To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the human services for
individuals and families in conformity with state and federal requirements.
2. b. To prepare, at least biennially, a comprehensive human services plan which must:
a. (1) Include human services determined essential in effectuating the purposes of this
chapter.
b. (2) Detail the human services identified by the state agency for provision by human
service centers and the services which the human service zones make available in
approved human service zone plans as a condition for the receipt of any funds
allocated or distributed by the state agency.
3. c. To make available, through human service zone or human service centersstate-operated
behavioral health clinics, any or all of the services set out in the comprehensive human
services plan on behalf of those individuals and families determined to be eligible for
those services under criteria established by the state agency.
4. d. To supervise and direct the comprehensive human services administered by human
service zone and human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics through
standard-setting, technical assistance, approval of human service zone and regional
plans, preparation of the comprehensive human services plan, evaluation of
comprehensive human services, and distribution of public money for services.
5. e. Within the limits of legislative appropriations and at rates determined payable by the state
agency, to pay qualified service providers, which meet standards for services and
operations, for the provision of the following services as defined in the comprehensive
human services plan which are provided to individuals who, on the basis of functional
assessments, income, and resources, are determined eligible for the services in
accordance with rules adopted by the state agency:
a. (1) Homemaker services;
b. (2) Chore services;
c. (3) Respite care;
d. (4) Home health aide services;
e. (5) Case management;
f. (6) Family home care;

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 25
g. (7) Personal attendant care;
h. (8) Adult family foster care; and
i. (9) Such other services as the state agency determines to be essential and appropriate
to sustain individuals in their homes and in their communities and to delay or
prevent institutional care.
6. f. To take actions, give directions, and adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.
2. For purposes of this chapter, resources do not include the individual's primary home and the
first fifty thousand dollars of liquid assets.
SECTION 37. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06.3-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06.3-02. Fees for services at regional centers.
The department may charge and collect fees and expenses for services provided through its
regional human service centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, and may authorize charging of
fees for child support services. The department may establish fee scales which recognize the service
recipient's or responsible relative's ability to pay. The department shall adopt such rules as are
necessary to implement this chapter and to define terms used in this chapter.
SECTION 38. AMENDMENT. Section 50-06.3-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
50-06.3-04. Liability for payment.
The recipient, patient, recipient's or patient's estate, and recipient's or patient's spouse are liable for
fees and expenses for services rendered by the department, through its regional human service
centersstate-operated behavioral health clinics, and for care and treatment expenses charged at the
state hospital. The parents of a recipient or patient are responsible for services, care, and treatment
provided prior to the eighteenth birthday of the recipient or patient.
SECTION 39. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - NON-OPIOID TREATMENT OPTIONS TO
REDUCE PAIN. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying options
to help patients with moderate to severe pain reduce pain while safely improving functional outcomes
and quality of care. The study may include an examination of non-opioid pharmacological treatment
options and existing opioid settlement funds, and explore options to use those funds to develop and
implement an education and awareness campaign on non-opioid treatment options. The legislative
management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to
implement its recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2113 - PAGE 26
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2113.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 2 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 6 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State